Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7835.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 5-1-10 and 5-1-15.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-1 entitled
"Architects" are hereby amended to read as follows:
5-1-10. Issuance and renewal of certificates.
(a) Upon payment of the fees required by § 5-1-11, an individual who has complied with §
5-1-8 or § 5-1-9 is entitled to a certificate of registration indicating that he or she is qualified to
practice architecture in this state. Each certificate of registration shall contain the name of the
individual to whom it was issued and his or her date of birth.
(b) Every certificate of registration is valid for a period of two (2) years and expires on the
last day of December of each odd-numbered year following its issuance, or another such date as
determined by the board/department. An architect may renew his or her certificate of registration
by paying the renewal fee or fees required by § 5-1-11. An architect who fails to renew his or her
certificate of registration prior to December 31 may not thereafter renew his or her certificate of
registration except upon payment of the renewal fee or fees and the additional fee required by § 5-
1-11. The board may require all applicants for renewal to provide the board with information,
including, but not limited to, a brief outline setting forth the professional activities of any applicant
during a period in which a certificate of registration has lapsed and other evidence of the continued
competence and good character of the applicant, all as the board deems necessary.
(c) [Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 82, § 2 and P.L. 2015, ch. 105, § 2].
5-1-15.1. Certificate of authorization for sole proprietorships, partnerships, limited-

liability partnerships, corporations, or limited-liability companies.
(a) A sole proprietorship, partnership, limited-liability partnership, corporation, or limited-
liability company shall be admitted to practice architecture in this state if:
(1) Two-thirds (⅔) of the partners (if a partnership or limited-liability partnership), two-
thirds (⅔) of the directors and officers (or shareholders if there are no directors, if a corporation),
or two-thirds (⅔) of the managers (or members if there are no managers, if a limited-liability
company) are registered under the laws of any state or any reciprocal jurisdiction as defined by the
National Council of Architectural Registration Boards to practice architecture or engineering;
(2) One-third (⅓) of the partners (if a partnership or limited-liability partnership), or one-
third (⅓) of the directors and officers (or shareholders if there are no directors, if a corporation), or
one-third (⅓) of the managers (or members if there are no managers, if a limited-liability company)
are registered under the laws of any state or reciprocal jurisdiction as defined by the National
Council of Architectural Registration Boards to practice architecture; and
(3) The person having the practice of architecture in his or her charge is himself or herself
a partner (if a partnership or limited-liability partnership), a director or officer (or shareholder if
there are no directors, if a corporation), or a manager (or member if there are no managers, if a
limited-liability company) and registered to practice architecture in this state.
(b) The board is empowered to require any sole proprietorship, partnership, or limited-
liability partnership, corporation, or limited-liability company practicing architecture in this state
to file information concerning its partners, shareholders, officers, directors, members, managers,
and other aspects of its business organization, upon any forms that the board prescribes.
(c)(a) The practice, or offer to practice, architecture as defined by this chapter by a sole
proprietorship, partnership, limited-liability partnership, corporation, or limited-liability company,
subsequently referred to as the “firm,” through one or more architects registered under the
provisions of this chapter, is permitted provided that the registered architect or architects are:
(1) Is a partner (if a partnership or limited-liability partnership), a director or officer (or
shareholder if there are no directors, if a corporation), or a manager (or member if there are no
managers, if a limited-liability company) of the firm; and
(2) Is in direct control of the practice or exercise of architecture in this state and exercises
responsible control (as that term is defined in § 5-1-2) of all personnel who act in on behalf of the
firm in professional and technical matters; and provided that the firm has been issued a certificate
of authorization by this board.
(d)(b) Every firm must obtain a certificate of authorization from this board, and those
individuals in direct control of the practice or who exercise responsible control of all personnel who
LC005419 - Page 2 of 5

act in on behalf of the firm in professional and technical matters must be registered with the board.
(c) The board is empowered to require any sole proprietorship, partnership, or limited-
liability partnership, corporation, or limited-liability company practicing architecture in this state
to file information concerning its partners, shareholders, officers, directors, members, managers,
and other aspects of its business organization, upon any forms that the board prescribes.
(d) The certificate of authorization shall be issued by the board/department upon
satisfaction of the provisions of this chapter, submission of a complete application and the payment
of a fee, when applicable, as determined by the board in accordance with § 5-1-11. This fee shall
be waived if the firm consists of only one person who is the Rhode Island registered architect.
Every firm must file an application for a certificate of authorization with the board on a form
provided by the board.
(e) Every certificate of authorization is valid for a period of two (2) years and expires on
the last day of December of each even-numbered year following its issuance, or another such date
as determined by the board/department.
(f) Renewals. A separate form provided by the board application shall be filed as directed
by the board/department with each renewal of the certificate of authorization along with the
payment of the renewal fee, if applicable.
(g) Duty to update application information. The firm shall complete a renewal file an
amended application form within thirty (30) days of the time any information previously filed with
the board has changed, is no longer true or valid, or has been revised for any reason.
(h) If, in the board’s judgment, the information contained on the application and/or renewal
form is satisfactory and complete, the board will issue a certificate of authorization for the firm to
practice architecture in this state.
(i) The board may require all applicants for renewal to provide the board with information,
including but not limited to, a brief outline setting forth the professional activities of any applicant
during a period in which a certificate of authorization has lapsed and other evidence of the
continued competence and good character of the applicant, all as the board deems necessary.
(f)(j) In the event of ownership transition or change in the responsible control of a firm, the
board may permit a six-month (6) grace period to allow a Rhode Island registered architect to
continue to practice until a new certificate of authorization is issued.
(k) Transition period for certificate of authorization requirements, effective January 1,
2027.
(1) Certificate of authorizations issued under the prior laws of this state regarding
directors/officers/managers, will remain valid as issued until such time as there is a change in the
LC005419 - Page 3 of 5

business entity structure or a change in the Rhode Island registered architect in responsible control
of the firm. However, all firms must comply with the new certificate of authorization requirements
set forth in subsection (a) of this section by December 31, 2028.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005419
========
LC005419 - Page 4 of 5